District of Columbia statutes.
46-355.01

Employer’s receipt of income-withholding order of another state.

An income-withholding order issued in another state may be sent by or on behalf of the obligee, or by the support enforcement agency, to the person defined as the obligor’s employer under Chapter 2 of this title [§ 46-201 et seq.] without first filing a petition or comparable pleading or registering the order with a tribunal of the District.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 501, 63 DCR 222